New York, session 2025-2026, S2578.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 1 of subdivision (c) of section 5205 of the civil 2 practice law and rules, as amended by chapter 93 of the laws of 1995, is 3 amended and a new paragraph 6 is added to read as follows: 4 1. Except as provided in paragraphs four [and], five and six of this 5 subdivision, all property while held in trust for a judgment debtor, 6 where the trust has been created by, or the fund so held in trust has 7 proceeded from, a person other than the judgment debtor, is exempt from 8 application to the satisfaction of a money judgment. 9 6. All trust, custodial accounts, annuities, insurance contracts, 10 monies, assets, or interests described in paragraph two of this subdivi- 11 sion shall be subject to the satisfaction of a money judgment in the 12 case of a civil claim or cause of action to recover from a defendant, 13 for physical, psychological or other injury or condition suffered by a 14 person as a result of acts by such defendant of rape in the first degree 15 as defined in section 130.35 of the penal law, or aggravated sexual 16 abuse in the first degree as defined in section 130.70 of the penal law, 17 or course of sexual conduct against a child in the first degree as 18 defined in section 130.75 of the penal law, where the victim of any such 19 offense was a minor at the time such offense was committed. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06836-01-5